Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB496.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.894 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 199.892 to 199.896, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Secretary" means secretary for health and family services;
(3) "Child-care center" means any child-care center that provides full- or part-time
care, day or night, to four (4) or more children in a nonresidential setting who are
not the children, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, or children in legal custody of the
operator. "Child-care center" shall not include any child-care facility operated by a
religious organization while religious services are being conducted, or a youth
development agency. For the purposes of this section, "youth development agency"
means a program with tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3), which
operates continuously throughout the year as an outside-school-hours center for
youth who are six (6) years of age or older, and for which there are no fee or
scheduled-care arrangements with the parent or guardian of the youth served;
(4) "Department" means the Department for Community Based Services;[ and]
(5) "Family child-care home" means a private home that is the primary residence of an
individual who provides full or part-time care day or night for six (6) or fewer
children who are not the children, siblings, stepchildren, grandchildren, nieces,
nephews, or children in legal custody of the provider; and
(6) "Outdoor, nature–based early learning and child care program" means a child-
care center that operates an early learning or child care program that:
(a) Is a full-day or partial-day program for children who are between the ages
of three (3) and twelve (12); and
(b) Operates at least fifty percent (50%) of the outdoor program's operating
hours outdoors in an approved outdoor natural space.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 493
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall, no later than June 30, 2027, promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A and in consultation with the
advisory committee established in subsection (2) of this section related to the
establishment, licensure, and operation of outdoor, nature–based early learning
and child care programs. At a minimum, the regulations shall include provisions
for:
(a) Bathroom use and diaper changing;
(b) Hand washing;
(c) Sheltering during inclement weather, including but not limited to a:
1. Covered pavilion;
2. Building; or
3. Tarp;
(d) Child–to–staff ratios for the outdoor setting;
(e) The safe storage of and ready access to medication;
(f) Accommodations for children with disabilities;
(g) The safe storage and preparation of food;
(h) Establishing safe boundaries in unenclosed outdoor spaces and boundaries
around hazards;
(i) Proper outdoor clothing for children;
(j) Access to potable drinking water;
(k) Appropriate sleeping areas for naps;
(l) Site-specific emergency and disaster preparedness plans;
(m) Site-specific evacuation plans;
(n) Land-use agreement requirements for operating on public or private land;
(o) Alignment of the regulations to environmental conditions;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 493
(p) Related data collection; and
(q) Related curriculum, training, and professional development for providers
and department staff.
(2) The Outdoor, Nature–Based Early Learning and Child Care Program Advisory
Committee is hereby established within the department and shall be composed of
the following fourteen (14) members:
(a) The commissioner of the department or the commissioner's designee;
(b) The director of the Division of Child Care within the department or the
director's designee;
(c) The director of the Division of Regulated Child Care within the department
or the director's designee; and
(d) Eleven (11) members appointed by the Governor as follows:
1. Five (5) nature-based preschool or child care providers with a
broad range of perspectives;
2. One (1) provider representing a licensed child-care center;
3. One (1) provider representing a licensed family child-care home;
4. One (1) individual representing a statewide organization that
represents environmental education with expertise in early childhood
programming;
5. One (1) individual representing a statewide early childhood
intermediary organization;
6. One (1) individual representing a professional development
organization with expertise in nature-based programming in an early
childhood setting; and
7. One (1) parent with a child who attended a nature-based early
childhood program.
(3) Each committee member appointed under subsection (2)(d) of this section shall
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 493
serve a term of three (3) years, except that initial appointments shall be staggered
by the Governor. A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by
expiration of a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(4) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall serve as chair of the
committee. The committee shall annually elect a member to serve as vice chair.
(5) The committee shall meet at least quarterly. A majority of the members of the
committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. If a vote on a
matter before the committee results in a tie, the commissioner or the
commissioner's designee shall cast an additional deciding vote.
(6) Committee members who are not full-time state government employees shall be
compensated for their time when attending committee meetings or performing
official duties as directed by the committee. Members of the committee shall be
reimbursed for all expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business
consistent with the reimbursement policy for state employees.
(7) The committee shall provide ongoing advice and input to the department, but
shall not become directly involved in the licensing or regulation of outdoor,
nature–based early learning and child care program matters by the department.
(8) The committee shall have thirty (30) days to review and comment on a proposed
administrative regulation before the regulation is promulgated, amended, or
repealed by the department.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed